Hawaii, session 2026, HB1589.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia are not only detrimental to residents of the State but also affect businesses, economic growth, and visitors to Hawaii. Creating a dementia-friendly business environment would greatly enhance the quality of life for those living with dementia and their caregivers, while also demonstrating that Alzheimer's disease and related dementias is not just a health issue, but also an economic and community development priority. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a Hawaii dementia business recognition program within the department of business, economic development, and tourism to promote brain health awareness in the business community and provide knowledge on the harmful effects of not only Alzheimer's disease, but all forms of dementia, to better serve and support customers while creating a dementia-capable workforce. SECTION 2. Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Hawaii dementia initiative business recognition program.  (a) There is established within the department the Hawaii dementia initiative business recognition program to promote awareness of Alzheimer's disease and dementia within the business community and a dementia-capable workforce.  The department shall collaborate with the executive office on aging to implement this program. (b)  The program shall be accessible through the department's website, where businesses may apply to become recognized as dementia-friendly or dementia business champions. (c)  The executive office on aging may support the department by providing a speakers bureau listing of approved organizations that provide dementia training for employees to businesses that apply for recognition under subsection (b).  Eighty-five per cent of current employees shall complete a one-hour training session in order for a business to become recognized as dementia-friendly or a dementia business champion. (d)  Upon completing the training under subsection (c), a business shall receive: (1)  Access to a badge for the website of the business, indicating that the business is certified by the program as dementia-friendly or a dementia business champion; and (2)  A decal or sticker of the Hawaii dementia initiative certified business logo to place at the physical location of the business. (e) The executive office on aging shall gather feedback on the program from non-profit organizations and other organizations that specialize in dementia. (f) The department, in collaboration with the executive office on aging, shall draft written guidance and protocols that staff and supervisors can reference in situations involving a customer or co-worker with dementia.  The written guidance and protocols shall be made available to all businesses recognized as dementia-friendly or dementia business champions. (g)  The department shall publish a list of recognized businesses on its website for access by individuals living with dementia and their families. (h)  The department may also promote the program and the list of Hawaii dementia initiative-certified businesses through various media to further incentivize business participation." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to establish and administer the Hawaii dementia initiative business recognition program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.